Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2324
Retirement system; membership status; not lost while employment continues.

Persons who have become members of the retirement system shall not thereafter lose their status as members while they remain employees.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 24, p. 409.